West Virginia, session 2026, SB542.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 4. Court Actions. §49-4-611. Time limitations for disposition decisions in abuse and neglect proceedings. Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, a disposition decision, as set forth in § 49-4-604(c) of this code, shall be rendered by the court no later than 12 months after the date of the ratification of the initial petition.